Maryland, session 2026, HB1134.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
21–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(f) “Device” means any instrument, apparatus, or contrivance, or any part or
accessory of an instrument, apparatus, or contrivance, that is intended:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1134*

HOUSE BILL 1134
(1) For use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention of
human disease; or
(2) To affect the structure or any function of the human body for medical,
surgical, or therapeutic purposes.
(g) (1) “Drug” means any substance or component of a substance:
(i) That is recognized in an official compendium;
(ii) That is intended for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation,
treatment, or prevention of disease in human beings; or
(iii) Except for food, that is intended to affect the structure or any
function of the human body.
(2) “Drug” does not include a device.
21–1114.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) (I) “GIFT” MEANS ANY PAYMENT, FOOD, ENTERTAINMENT,
TRAVEL, SUBSCRIPTION, ADVANCE, SERVICE, OR ANYTHING ELSE OF VALUE
PROVIDED TO A HEALTH CARE PROFESSIONAL, UNLESS THE HEALTH CARE
PROFESSIONAL REIMBURSES THE COST AT FAIR MARKET VALUE.
(II) “GIFT” DOES NOT INCLUDE PEER–REVIEWED MEDICAL
LITERATURE.
(3) (I) “HEALTH CARE PROFESSIONAL” MEANS:
1. AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS:
A. LICENSED OR CERTIFIED UNDER THE HEALTH
OCCUPATIONS ARTICLE; AND
B. AUTHORIZED TO PRESCRIBE OR RECOMMEND
PRESCRIBED PRODUCTS;
2. A PARTNERSHIP OR CORPORATION COMPOSED OF
THE INDIVIDUALS DESCRIBED IN ITEM 1 OF THIS SUBPARAGRAPH; OR

HOUSE BILL 1134 3
3. AN OFFICER, AN EMPLOYEE, AN AGENT, OR A
CONTRACTOR OF A PERSON DESCRIBED IN ITEM 1 OR 2 OF THIS SUBPARAGRAPH
WHO IS ACTING IN THE COURSE AND SCOPE OF EMPLOYMENT OR A CONTRACT
RELATED TO OR SUPPORTIVE OF THE PROVISION OF HEALTH CARE TO INDIVIDUALS.
(II) “HEALTH CARE PROFESSIONAL” DOES NOT INCLUDE AN
INDIVIDUAL EMPLOYED SOLELY BY A MANUFACTURER.
(B) A PERSON THAT SELLS DRUGS OR DEVICES MAY NOT GIVE OR OFFER TO
GIVE TO A HEALTH CARE PROFESSIONAL GIFTS IN A CALENDAR YEAR THAT HAVE A
TOTAL COMBINED RETAIL VALUE OF MORE THAN $50.
21–1207.
A PERSON WHO VIOLATES § 21–1114 OF THIS TITLE IS GUILTY OF A
MISDEMEANOR AND ON CONVICTION IS SUBJECT TO A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $5,000
OR IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 6 MONTHS OR BOTH.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.